California, session 20252026, AB5.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 15307 is added to the Elections Code, to read:15307. (a) On or before the 13th day following the election, an elections official shall finish counting all ballots, except those described in subdivision (b), and shall release the vote count for those ballots.(b) The requirement to finish counting all ballots and release the vote count for those ballots on or before the 13th day following the election does not apply to any of the following:(1) A duplicate ballot prepared pursuant to Section 15210 or subdivision (c) of Section 3106.(2) A vote by mail ballot that is forwarded to the county elections official who issued the ballot pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 3017.(3) A vote by mail ballot for which a voter has the opportunity either to verify a signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019 or to provide a signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019.(4) A provisional ballot.(5) A ballot cast by a person who completes a conditional voter registration pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 2170) of Chapter 2 of Division 2.(6) A ballot received by an elections official after the fourth day following the election.(c) If an elections official will not meet the deadline set forth in subdivision (a), the elections official shall file a notice of extension with the Secretary of State and include the reason for the extension. Both the Secretary of State and the elections official shall post the extension filing on their respective websites.(d) Nothing in this section alters the statutory obligations imposed by Sections 3019, 15320, 15321, and 15342 regarding counties completing their respective vote canvasses.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.